North Dakota, session 69, HB1052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-13-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
39-13-09. Tourist-oriented directional signs.
1. In this section:
a. "Tourist-oriented directional sign" means a sign providing identification of and
directional information for tourist-related businesses, services, or activities.
b. "Tourist-related business, service, or activity" means rural agricultural business
and tourism attractions, including recreation, historical sites, festival and cultural
events, lodging and food services which are singularly and uniquely related to
historical, cultural, or recreational tourist attractions, and guide services, but does
not include any business operated under a franchise agreement. The term
includes a business that derives a major portion of income or visitors from
individuals who do not reside in the immediate area of the business. The
immediate area of the business is within the city limits in which the business is
located, or within one mile [1.61 kilometers] from the business if located outside
city limits.
2. Notwithstanding section 24-01-12, the department shall establish by rule standards for
the erection and maintenance of tourist-oriented directional signs. The rules must
conform to federal standards for tourist-oriented directional signs adopted under
23 U.S.C. 131(q) as of July 1, 1991, and with the manual adopted by the department
Page No. 1 25.8040.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
under section 39-13-06 except that the rules must provide that logos may not be used
on tourist-oriented directional signs.
3. Upon the request of any person, a local authority that has adopted an ordinance
permitting the erection of tourist-oriented directional signs may authorize their erection
within the right of way of any highway under the jurisdiction of the local authority
except that tourist-oriented directional signs may not be erected within the right of way
of the interstate highway system. A tourist-oriented directional sign may not be erected
unless it is erected in compliance with rules adopted by the department for such signs.
4. The permit applicant shall engage a qualified contractor for the erection, installation,
and maintenance of tourist-oriented directional signs within the right of way of any
highway under the jurisdiction of the department except that tourist-oriented directional
signs may notmust be erectedlimited to rural highways not within the right of way of
the interstate highway system. A tourist-oriented directional sign may not be erected
unless it is erected in compliance with rules adopted by the department for such signs.
Page No. 2 25.8040.01000